Washington statutes.
RCW 10.98.160

Procedures, development considerations—Washington integrated justice information board, review and recommendations.

In the development and modification of the procedures, definitions, and reporting capabilities of the section, the department, the office of financial management, and the responsible agencies and persons shall consider the needs of other criminal justice agencies such as the administrative office of the courts, local law enforcement agencies, local jails, the indeterminate sentence review board, the clemency board, prosecuting attorneys, and affected state agencies such as the office of financial management and legislative committees dealing with criminal justice issues. The Washington integrated justice information board shall review and provide recommendations to state justice agencies and the courts for development and modification of the statewide justice information network.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 40 s 33; 2005 c 282 s 25; 2003 c 104 s 2; 1999 c 143 s 53; 1987 c 462 s 5; 1984 c 17 s 16.]

NOTES:

Application—Recalculation of community custody terms—2011 1st sp.s. c 40: See note following RCW 9.94A.501.

Effective dates—1987 c 462: See note following RCW 13.04.116.